Utah statutes.
38-1-15.   Sale -- Redemption -- Disposition of proceeds.
The court shall cause the property to be sold in satisfaction of the liens and
costs as in the case of foreclosure of mortgages, subject to the same right of
redemption. If the proceeds of sale after the payment of costs shall not be
sufficient to satisfy the whole amount of liens included in the decree, then
such proceeds shall be paid in the order above designated, and pro rata to the
persons claiming in each class where the sum realized is insufficient to pay
the persons of such class in full. Any excess shall be paid to the owner.
